Utah statutes.
20A-1-307.   Residency requirements for person who verifies a signature on a petition.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this title that requires a person who signs the verification on a petition to be a resident, a person who is not a resident may sign the verification on a petition if:

(1)  the person signing the petition is a resident who is temporarily located outside the state at the time of signing; and

(2)  the person signing the verification meets all the requirements in the verification, except for the residency requirement.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 2012 General Session

